Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HAVEN FOR HEROES.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Haven for Heroes to plan and design a museum chronicling the history of the Anoka State Hospital and the history of mental health care and to preserve the historic auditorium at the state hospital campus in Anoka. new text end